District of Columbia statutes.
34-1921.07

Right to alter, amend, or repeal reserved; rights under United States Code preserved.

Congress reserves the right to alter, amend, or repeal this subchapter, but nothing herein shall abridge or lessen the rights granted telegraph companies under Title 65, § 5263 [repealed] and the following, United States Revised Statutes of the Code of the Laws of the United States of America.

Mar. 3, 1905, 33 Stat. 986, ch. 1415, § 7
1981 Ed., § 43-1416.
1973 Ed., § 43-1416.
Sections 5263 to 5269, inclusive, of the Revised Statutes, referred to in this section, were repealed by the Act of July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 327, ch. 256, § 1.